Florida, session 2026, SB658.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 23 24 Section 1.âPresent subsection (4) of section 83.51, Florida 25 Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (5) and amended, and a 26 new subsection (4) and subsection (6) are added to that section, 27 to read: 28 83.51âLandlordâs obligation to maintain premises.â 29 (4)(a)âAt all times during a tenancy, if a water body that 30 is not a swimming pool exists within 150 feet of the dwelling 31 unit, the landlord must ensure that either: 32 1.âAll doors and windows providing direct access to the 33 exterior of the dwelling unit are equipped with an exit alarm 34 that has a minimum sound pressure rating of 85 dB A at 10 feet; 35 or 36 2.âAll doors providing direct access to the exterior of the 37 dwelling unit are equipped with a self-closing, self-latching 38 device with a release mechanism placed no lower than 54 inches 39 above the floor. 40 (b)âIf the dwelling unit has a swimming pool on its 41 premises, the landlord must ensure that the dwelling unit is 42 equipped with at least one pool safety feature as described in 43 s. 515.27(1). 44 (c)âA landlord who violates this subsection commits a 45 misdemeanor of the second degree, punishable as provided in s. 46 775.082 or s. 775.083, except that it is not a violation of this 47 subsection if: 48 1.âThe violation is due to the removal or modification of 49 any safety feature required under paragraph (a) or paragraph (b) 50 by the tenant, a member of the tenantâs family, or a person on 51 the premises with the tenantâs consent; 52 2.âSuch removal or modification occurred without the 53 landlordâs knowledge; and 54 3.âThe landlord corrects the violation within 45 days after 55 receiving actual knowledge thereof. 56 (d)âFor the purposes of this subsection, the term: 57 1.ââSwimming poolâ has the same meaning as in s. 515.25. 58 2.ââWater bodyâ means any water or body of water regularly 59 at a depth of at least 24 inches at its deepest point. The term 60 does not include underground water that cannot be accessed by 61 individuals from an access point located within 150 feet of the 62 dwelling unit. 63 (5)(4)âThe landlord is not responsible to the tenant under 64 this section for conditions created or caused by the negligent 65 or wrongful act or omission of the tenant, a member of the 66 tenantâs family, or a other person on the premises with the 67 tenantâs consent, including the removal or modification of any 68 safety features required under subsection (4) by the tenant, a 69 member of the tenantâs family, or a person on the premises with 70 the tenantâs consent. 71 (6)âThe requirements of subsection (4) do not apply to a 72 nontransient apartment as defined in s. 509.242(1)(d). 73 Section 2.âSubsection (6) is added to section 509.211, 74 Florida Statutes, to read: 75 509.211âSafety regulations.â 76 (6)(a)âIf a public lodging establishment licensed as a 77 vacation rental has a water body within 150 feet of the rental 78 unit which is not a swimming pool, the licensee must ensure 79 that: 80 1.âAll doors and windows providing direct access to the 81 exterior of the rental unit are equipped with an exit alarm that 82 has a minimum sound pressure rating of 85 dB A at 10 feet; or 83 2.âAll doors providing direct access to the exterior of the 84 rental unit are equipped with a self-closing, self-latching 85 device with a release mechanism placed no lower than 54 inches 86 above the floor. 87 (b)âIf a public lodging establishment licensed as a 88 vacation rental has a swimming pool on its premises, the 89 licensee must ensure that the rental unit is equipped with at 90 least one pool safety feature as described in s. 515.27(1). 91 (c)âThe division may suspend or revoke the license and fine 92 the licensee for noncompliance with this subsection. 93 (d)âA licensee who violates this subsection commits a 94 misdemeanor of the second degree, punishable as provided in s. 95 775.082 or s. 775.083, except that it is not a violation of this 96 subsection if: 97 1.âThe violation is due to the removal or modification of 98 any safety feature required under paragraph (a) or paragraph (b) 99 by a guest, a member of a guestâs family, or a person on the 100 premises of the rental unit with a guestâs consent; 101 2.âSuch removal or modification occurred without the 102 licenseeâs knowledge; and 103 3.âThe licensee corrects the violation within 45 days after 104 receiving actual knowledge thereof. 105 (e)âFor the purposes of this subsection, the term: 106 1.ââSwimming poolâ has the same meaning as in s. 515.25. 107 2.ââVacation rentalâ has the same meaning as in s. 108 509.242(1)(c). 109 3.ââWater bodyâ means any water or body of water regularly 110 at a depth of at least 24 inches at its deepest point. The term 111 does not include underground water that cannot be accessed by 112 individuals from an access point located within 150 feet of the 113 rental unit. 114 (f)âA public lodging establishment that is licensed as a 115 vacation rental which has a water body within 150 feet of the 116 rental unit or a swimming pool located on the premises must file 117 a certificate upon licensure and renewal stating that the rental 118 unit complies with the requirements of this subsection. 119 (g)âThe division shall adopt rules to implement this 120 subsection. 121 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.